Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 3 Registration of and Committee Organization of Political Parties and Bodies

21-2-110.
Filing of registration statements by political parties or bodies with the Secretary of State; contents of registration statements; amendments; filing fees; failure to file statement.

The chief executive officer of each political party or body operating in this state shall, within 60 days after the date of its organization or after June 24, 1964, whichever is later, file with the Secretary of State a registration statement setting forth:

Its name and the date and place of its creation;

The general purposes for which it was created;

Certified copies of its charter, bylaws, rules, and regulations, and other documents of like dignity governing its organization and operation;

The address of its principal office;

The names, home addresses, and titles of the persons composing its governing committee and executive officers; and

Such other information as the Secretary of State may require as necessary or appropriate in the public interest.

The chief executive officer of each municipal executive committee, whose state executive committee has already filed with the Secretary of State as a political party or body, shall promptly file with the city clerk of the municipality and with its state political party or body executive committee a registration statement setting forth:

Its name and certified copies of its charter, bylaws, rules and regulations, and other documents of like dignity governing its organization and operation;

The address of its principal office; and

The names of its members, home addresses, and titles of the persons composing its governing committee and executive officers.

No registration statement of a party, body, or municipal executive committee shall be filed if the name of such party, body, or municipal executive committee is identical with, or deceptively similar to, the name of any other existing party, body, or municipal executive committee which was organized earlier and is eligible at the time to file its registration statement with the Secretary of State.

Within 30 days after the occurrence of a change in the information contained in any registration statement, or prior amendment thereto, the chief executive officer of the party, body, or municipal executive committee filing such statement shall file an amendment thereto setting forth the information necessary to maintain the currency of such statement.

The Secretary of State shall receive a fee of $10.00 for filing each registration statement required by subsection (a) of this Code section and a fee of $2.00 for filing each amendment thereto.

A political party, body, or municipal executive committee failing to file a registration statement as required by subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section at least 60 days before any primary or election at which it shall seek to have candidates on the ballot shall not have its name or the names of its candidates placed on any nomination petition, ballot, or ballot label.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-901, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 21, § 1.

Cross references.

Designation by political parties of poll watchers, §

21-2-408

.

21-2-111.
Establishment of state and county executive committees; membership and officers; duties; applicability of chapter to persons seeking party office in a primary.

Each political party shall establish and maintain a state executive committee exercising state-wide jurisdiction and control over party affairs and a county executive committee in each county in which it holds a primary, exercising county-wide jurisdiction and control over party affairs. A party may establish and maintain such other committees as it may from time to time deem advisable. The membership of such committees shall be selected in the manner determined by the state executive committee. Each committee shall be presided over by a chairperson and shall have a secretary and such other officers as deemed advisable, and a list of all such committees shall be filed with the appropriate election official for the state or county. The state executive committee shall have the same power over municipal party executive committees as it has over county party executive committees.

The state executive committee of each political party shall formulate, adopt, and promulgate rules and regulations, consistent with law, governing the conduct of conventions and other party affairs. No such rule and regulation shall be effective until copies thereof, certified by the chairperson, have been filed with the Secretary of State.

The respective county executive committees of each political party shall formulate, adopt, and promulgate rules and regulations, consistent with law and the rules and regulations of the state executive committee, governing the conduct of conventions and other party affairs. No such rule and regulation shall be effective until copies thereof, certified by the chairperson, have been filed with the superintendent of the county.

Any person seeking party office in a primary shall be governed by this chapter relating to a person seeking party nomination in a primary insofar as such application is practicable.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-902, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 6.

21-2-112.
Hearings before state committee; suspension of powers and duties of county committee; delegation of powers by state committee.

When the state executive committee of a political party has reason to believe that the orders, rules, or regulations of the state executive committee, relating to all party matters except the conduct of primaries, are not being, or will not be, fairly, impartially, or properly enforced or applied in any county by the county executive committee of the party in such county, the state executive committee shall issue to such county committee a written notice of opportunity for hearing.

A notice of opportunity for hearing shall state the substance of the order which the state committee proposes to issue under subsection (e) of this Code section and advise such county committee of its right to a hearing upon request to the state committee if such request is received by it within the time specified in the notice.

Whenever such county committee requests a hearing in accordance with this Code section, the state committee shall immediately set a date, time, and place for such hearing and shall forthwith notify the county committee thereof.

A stenographic record of the testimony and other evidence submitted at the hearing shall be taken and filed with the state committee. Each witness appearing at the hearing shall be sworn prior to testifying.

If the state committee does not receive a timely request for hearing or if a hearing is requested and conducted as provided in this Code section and the state committee determines that all or any part of the proposed relief described in the notice of opportunity for hearing should be granted, the state committee may issue an order, effective for a certain period, suspending and superseding all or any part of the powers and duties of the county committee and directing that the powers and duties which would have been exercised and performed by such county executive committee in those matters in which they have been suspended and superseded shall be exercised and performed by the persons designated by the state executive committee, who may be residents of any county of this state, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter.

The state executive committee may delegate its powers under this Code section to a subcommittee.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-903, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 11; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-113.
Chief executive and county executive committees.

Each political body shall establish and maintain a chief executive committee exercising jurisdiction and control over body affairs in the area of the state in which it operates and a county executive committee exercising county-wide jurisdiction and control over body affairs in each county in which the body operates if it operates in two or more counties. A body may establish and maintain such other committees as it may from time to time deem advisable. The membership of such committees shall be selected in the manner determined by the chief executive committee. Each committee shall be presided over by a chairperson and shall have a secretary and such other officers as deemed advisable.

The chief executive committee of each political body shall formulate, adopt, and promulgate rules and regulations, consistent with law, governing the conduct of conventions and other body affairs. No such rule and regulation shall be effective until copies thereof, certified by the chairperson, have been filed with the Secretary of State.

The respective county executive committees of each political body shall formulate, adopt, and promulgate rules and regulations, consistent with law and the rules and regulations of the chief executive committee, governing the conduct of conventions and other body affairs. No such rule or regulation shall be effective until a copy thereof, certified by the chairperson, has been filed with the superintendent of the county.

Whenever a municipal executive committee of a political party is established, such committee shall formulate, adopt, and promulgate rules and regulations, consistent with law and the rules and regulations of the State Election Board and the state executive committee, governing the conduct of primaries, conventions, and other party affairs within the municipality. No such rule and regulation shall be effective until copies thereof, certified by the chairperson, have been filed with the clerk of the municipality.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-905, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.